District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-1013

Partnership conversion to a limited liability company.

Repealed.

July 23, 1994, D.C. Law 10-138, § 14, 41 DCR 3010
Sept. 8, 1995, D.C. Law 11-38, § 2(d), 42 DCR 3269
Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-191, § 29, 53 DCR 6794
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(s), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-1013.
1981 Ed., § 29-1313.